Arkansas, session 2025, HB1905.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Buyer Beware Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-10-101, concerning the responsibilities
of real estate licensees and appraisers, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) A licensee acting as the agent of an owner in the sale of
residential real estate property shall not disclose the current taxable value
of the residential real estate property in a listing of the residential real
*LGL182*
03/31/2025 10:33:05 AM LGL182

HB1905
estate property.
(2) The listing under subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall
direct a potential or actual transferee of real property to contact the
office of the county assessor for the current assessed value of the
residential real estate property.
(3) The licensee under subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall
disclose in writing to a potential or actual transferee of real property
that:
(A) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 79, and state law
provide limitations for a taxpayer on the increase of the assessed value of
his or her real property;
(B) The limitations under subdivision (e)(3)(A) of this
section do not transfer to the potential or actual transferee of real
property at the time of the real estate transaction; and
(C) The office of the county assessor may provide the
assessed value of the residential real estate property at the request of the
potential or actual transferee of real property.



















03/31/2025 10:33:05 AM LGL182